Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 17 DEPARTMENT OF WATER RESOURCES — WATER RESOURCE BOARD
§ 42-1734A. Comprehensive state water plan. — (1) The board shall, subject to legislative approval, progressively formulate, adopt and implement a comprehensive state water plan for conservation, development, management and optimum use of all unappropriated water resources and waterways of this state in the public interest. The comprehensive state water plan shall consist of: Part A — statewide policies, goals and objectives; and Part B

component water plans for individual waterways, river basins, drainage areas, river reaches, ground water aquifers or other geographic designations. As part of Part B of the comprehensive state water plan, the board may designate selected waterways as protected rivers as provided in this chapter. The comprehensive state water plan shall be based upon studies and public hearings in affected areas at which all interested parties shall be given the opportunity to appear, or to present written testimony in response to published proposals for such policy programs and proposed designations. A minimum of sixty (60) days shall be allowed between publication of a proposal and the date on which no further testimony on the proposal will be accepted. All comments in writing shall be preserved as a part of the record of the board. In adopting a comprehensive state water plan the board shall be guided by these criteria:

Existing rights, established duties, and the relative priorities of water established in article XV, section 3, of the constitution of the state of Idaho, shall be protected and preserved;

Optimum economic development in the interest of and for the benefit of the state as a whole shall be achieved by integration and coordination of the use of water and the augmentation of existing supplies and by protection of designated waterways for all beneficial purposes;

Adequate and safe water supplies for human consumption and maximum supplies for other beneficial uses shall be preserved and protected;

Subject to prior existing water rights for the beneficial uses now or hereafter prescribed by law, minimum stream flow for aquatic life, recreation and aesthetics and the minimization of pollution and the protection and preservation of waterways in the manner hereafter provided shall be fostered and encouraged and consideration shall be given to the development and protection of water recreation facilities;

Watershed conservation practices consistent with sound engineering and economic principles shall be encouraged.

irrigation;

flood control;

water supply;

timber;

mining;

livestock watering;

scenic values;

natural or cultural features;

domestic, municipal, commercial and industrial uses; and

other aspects of environmental quality and economic development.

(2) The board may develop a comprehensive state water plan in stages based upon waterways, river basins, drainage areas, river reaches, groundwater aquifers, or other geographic considerations. The component of the comprehensive state water plan prepared for particular water resources and waterways shall contain, among other things, the following:

(a) A description of the water resources and waterway or waterways that are the subject of the plan, including pertinent maps detailing the geographic area of the plan;

(b) A description of the significant resources of the water resources and waterway or waterways;

(c) A description of the various existing and planned uses for these resources including currently undeveloped areas of the waterway and future plans for those areas, with a discussion of the advantages and disadvantages associated with each planned use; and

(d) A discussion of goals, objectives, and recommendations for improving, developing, or conserving the water resources and waterway or waterways in relation to these resources, including an examination of how different uses will promote the overall public interest, a statement as to the goals the plan expects to achieve, and an analysis of how any specific recommendations further those goals. A description of the methodology used in developing the plan shall be included.

(3) The description of the resources and uses in subsections (2)(b) and (2)(c) of this section shall contain, among other things:

(a) navigation;

(b) power development;

(c) energy conservation;

(d) fish and wildlife;

(e) recreational opportunities;

(4) The comprehensive state water plan may designate protected rivers. Designations shall be based upon a determination by the board that the value of preserving a waterway for particular uses outweighs that of developing the waterway for other beneficial uses and shall specify whether a protected river is designated as a natural or recreational river. The plan may also describe those water resources and waterways which are not designated as protected rivers.

(5) In designating a natural river, the board shall prohibit the following activities:

(a) construction or expansion of dams or impoundments;

(b) construction of hydropower projects;

(c) construction of water diversion works;

(d) dredge or placer mining;

(e) alterations of the stream bed; and

(f) mineral or sand and gravel extraction within the stream bed.

(6) In designating a recreational river, the board shall determine which of the activities listed in subsection (5) of this section shall be prohibited and may specify the terms and conditions under which activities that are not prohibited may go forward.

§ 42-1734B. Board procedures for adopting a comprehensive state water plan.

Prior to the adoption of the comprehensive state water plan or any component of the comprehensive plan, the board shall conduct hearings in the manner provided in section 42-1734A, Idaho Code.

In the preparation, adoption, and implementation of the comprehensive state water plan, the board shall encourage the cooperation, participation, and assistance of state agencies. The board also shall solicit economic, energy, environmental, and other technical studies and recommendations from state agencies with particular expertise. All agencies of the state of Idaho shall cooperate with the board by providing requested existing information and studies pertaining in any manner to any matters which are the subject of this act. The board shall have discretion to balance all factors relevant to the formulation, adoption and implementation of the comprehensive state water plan and implementation and the designation of protected rivers.

Any state agency may petition the board to amend the comprehensive state water plan. The board shall review any petition filed pursuant to this section within six (6) months after it is filed and shall either commence action to amend the comprehensive plan or set forth its reasons for denying the request in writing.

All state agencies shall exercise their duties in a manner consistent with the comprehensive state water plan. These duties include but are not limited to the issuance of permits, licenses, and certifications; provided, however, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect the authority of any state agency with respect to activities not prohibited by the comprehensive state water plan. The designation of a waterway as a natural or recreation river shall not preclude the department of health and welfare from establishing water quality standards for such waterway.

When a comprehensive state water plan is adopted, copies thereof shall be filed in the office of the governor and director of the department of water resources, and published and distributed generally.

The comprehensive state water plan and any component thereof developed for a particular waterway or waterways is subject to review and amendment by the legislature of the state of Idaho by law at the regular session immediately following the board’s adoption of the comprehensive state water plan or component thereof.

The board shall submit all subsequent changes to the legislature as provided in section 7, article XV, of the constitution of the state of Idaho. The board shall also use best efforts to provide notice of all subsequent changes to each member of the legislature on or before the first day of the regular legislative session following the change.

The board shall review and reevaluate Part A of the comprehensive state water plan, or any one (1) or more of the component water plans comprising Part B of the comprehensive state water plan, upon the adoption of a concurrent resolution of the legislature directing the review or requesting a specific amendment to the plan. The board also may undertake the review in response to a petition for amendment filed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, or upon the board’s own initiative, as determined necessary by the board. Amendments to Part A or Part B of the comprehensive state water plan shall be adopted in the same manner as the original plan.

A protected river designated by the board shall not become a final part of the comprehensive state water plan until approved by law. If the legislature does not approve a protected river by law at the regular session immediately following the board’s designation of such protected river, then the designation of such protected river shall terminate and any prohibition or terms and conditions imposed on such protected river pursuant to subsection (5) or (6) of section 42-1734A, Idaho Code, shall be terminated ten (10) days following the end of the session. The failure to approve a protected river shall not operate to invalidate a comprehensive plan or component thereof. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent the legislature, however, from approving such protected river and reinstituting or modifying such prohibitions or terms and conditions in a subsequent session.
(10) After adoption of a comprehensive plan or component thereof, the board shall administer the implementation of the plan.

§ 42-1734C. Status of comprehensive state water plan before federal agencies.

The comprehensive state water plan required by this chapter shall be submitted to the federal energy regulatory commission, and the pacific northwest electric power and conservation planning council, and any other federal agencies as the state water plan for the conservation, development, management and optimum use of the state of Idaho’s water resource.

§ 42-1734D. Designation of interim protected rivers.

Prior to the adoption of a comprehensive plan for a waterway, the board may designate a waterway as an interim protected river. Any state agency may petition the board to designate a waterway as an interim protected river. The board shall promulgate procedural rules for designation of interim protected rivers. The rules shall provide adequate notice to interested parties of any petitions filed or actions contemplated pursuant to this act.

The board shall determine whether the nominated waterway merits designation as an interim protected river. The board shall accept or reject a nomination within six (6) months after it is filed. There shall be no review of any board decision rejecting or accepting a nomination for an interim protected river. Designation of a waterway as an interim protected river shall be based upon a determination that:

It is probable that the waterway would be designated a protected river in the comprehensive state water plan; and

Interim protected river status is necessary to protect the values that would support such waterway’s designation as a protected river in a comprehensive state water plan.

In designating a waterway for interim protected river status, the board shall indicate which of the activities listed in subsection 42-1734A(5), Idaho Code, shall be prohibited.

Interim protected river status shall remain in effect until the earliest of:

The adoption of a comprehensive state water plan for the waterway designated as an interim protected river;

Two (2) years following the designation of an interim protected river unless extended by law;

The revocation of a waterway’s interim protected river status by law.

Any person may petition the board for a determination that a particular proposed action or project will not significantly impair the values supporting a waterway’s designation as an interim protected river. The board shall consider among other things environmental impact statements, technical studies and any other relevant comments or recommendations prepared by the petitioner for use before other state or federal agencies. The board may also consider any other relevant information. If the board determines that the proposed action or project will not significantly impair the values supporting a waterway’s designation as a protected river, then this section shall not apply to such action or project, except that the board, after consultation with relevant state agencies, may impose appropriate conditions on such action or project. An aggrieved party may seek judicial review of the board’s decision pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

If a waterway is designated as an interim protected river, then the board shall proceed to prepare a comprehensive state water plan for the waterway. The board shall in preparing the state comprehensive water plan for the waterway consider, after review of all relevant factors contained in section 42-1734A, Idaho Code, whether the designation should continue or whether modification of the designation is warranted.

§ 42-1734E. Remedies.

The attorney general, at the request of the board, shall commence a civil action to enjoin any person violating any provision of this chapter and to recover actual damages in that amount required to restore a protected river and its riparian area to a condition reasonably comparable to that existing prior to the violation.

It shall be the duty of the attorney general to institute and prosecute all enforcement actions provided for in this chapter.

§ 42-1734F. Rights not affected.

No provision of this chapter, or any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, shall in any way limit, restrict, or conflict with approved applications for the appropriation of water or with vested property rights existing on the date a waterway is designated for protected river status or interim protected river status. For the purpose of this chapter, nonvested rights shall include, but not be limited to, pending applications for state mining permits or mineral leases, and pending applications for the appropriation of water.

No provision of this chapter, or any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall bar a water user or his agent from cleaning, maintaining or replacing a water diversion structure existing on or before the date a river is designated as protected. A water user or his agent may remove any obstructions from the stream channel, if such obstruction interferes with the delivery of, or use of, water under any existing water right. The provisions of this section do not relieve a person from complying with any other applicable laws.

Nothing in this act shall prevent or restrict the relicensing of existing hydropower projects that have been previously licensed by the federal energy regulatory commission and which have generated electricity. Any designation of waterways as interim protected rivers or protected rivers shall not affect the operation or relicensing, including but not limited to the expansion of capacity which does not enlarge existing boundaries or project impoundments of any hydropower project existing and that has been previously licensed by the federal energy regulatory commission and which have generated electricity as of the date of the designation.

§ 42-1734G. Water rights.

No provisions of this chapter, or any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, shall be construed to establish a water right. Any water rights necessary to fulfill the purposes of this chapter shall be obtained pursuant to the provision of chapter 2 or chapter 15, title 42, Idaho Code.

§ 42-1734H. Designation of particular rivers as interim protected rivers.

The board shall designate the following waterways as interim protected rivers pursuant to section 42-1734D, Idaho Code:

Priest River, from the Canadian Border to the confluence of Priest Lake;

South Fork of the Boise River, from Anderson Ranch Dam to Neal Bridge;

Snake River, from Section 5, Township 11 South, Range 20 East, B.M. to King Hill;

The following waterways within the Payette River Basin:

North Fork of the Payette River, from Cabarton Bridge to Banks;

South Fork of the Payette River, from the Sawtooth Wilderness Boundary to Banks;

Main Payette River, from Banks to Black Canyon Dam; and

Henry’s Fork of the Snake River from its point of origin at Henry’s Lake to the point of its confluence with the backwaters of Ashton Reservoir.

The board shall determine which of the activities listed in subsection (5) of section 42-1734A, Idaho Code, shall be prohibited.

§ 42-1734I. Designation under federal law.

Designation of a waterway as a protected river pursuant to this chapter shall not be a basis for seeking inclusion of such waterway in the national wild and scenic rivers system pursuant to 16, United States Code section 1273(a)(ii) unless the act designating the waterway as a protected river specifically requests the governor to seek inclusion of the waterway in the national wild and scenic rivers system.

§ 42-1735. Appointment of counsel — Hearing officers.

The board may appoint legal counsel or may retain private counsel independent of the counsel appointed by the director of the department.

The board may utilize hearing officers during any hearing processes which are assigned to the board by law.

§ 42-1736. Legislative review. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 97, § 28, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 42-1736A. Water resource policy. [Repealed.]

§ 42-1736B. Water resource policy actions.

All future filings, permits and decrees on the unappropriated waters of this state shall be determined with respect to the effect such filings, permits and decrees will have on the minimum daily flow of the affected stream or river, or on the maintenance level of the affected lake or reservoir.

All water plans and development projects proposed by the water resource board shall be subject to review and approval of the legislature, except that those projects funded from the water resource board revolving development account [fund] of less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) need not have prior legislative approval.

In further recognition of the authority granted by law to the water resource board by the provisions of section 42-1734, Idaho Code, and in further recognition of the right of the legislature to review and approve the actions of the water resource board, the water resource board is specifically directed:

To inventory all of the unappropriated waters of this state;

To recommend to the legislature appropriations in trust for the people of Idaho for specific purposes;

To develop a list of specific proposals for storage of any unappropriated waters of this state, which proposals shall show location, costs, and proposed uses and benefits;

To take all necessary actions to assure that Idaho citizens shall not be denied the right to divert and appropriate to beneficial uses, under the provisions of article XV of the constitution of the state of Idaho, the unappropriated waters of this state.

§ 42-1737. Board approval — Criteria — Hearings — Appeals — Defining a misdemeanor — Injunctions.

All project proposals involving the impoundment of water in a reservoir with an active storage capacity in excess of ten thousand (10,000) acre-feet, or the diversion of natural flow water appropriated pursuant to section 42-234, Idaho Code, for a managed recharge project in excess of ten thousand (10,000) acre-feet on an average annual basis, shall be submitted to the board for its approval or disapproval. No construction shall be commenced on any such project nor shall any diversion be permitted prior to receipt of board approval as herein provided and the board may institute injunctive proceedings to halt such construction or diversion. In the event a project is disapproved, this fact shall be certified by the board to the director of the department and such certification shall constitute the petition for cancelation of permit required by section 42-302, Idaho Code, and, pursuant to such certification, the procedure for cancelation of permit issued for such project shall be carried forward by said director.

In determining whether a project proposal shall be approved, or disapproved, the board shall be guided by the following criteria:

Conserving the highest use of the water for all purposes.

The maximum economic development of the waters involved.

The control of the waters of this state for all beneficial purposes, including drainage, sanitation and flood control.

That sufficient water is available for appropriation for beneficial use.

The prevention of wasteful, uneconomic, impracticable or unreasonable use of the waters involved.

That all vested and inchoate rights to the waters of this state or to the use thereof have been protected by the issuance of a permit for the project by the director of the department.

The state water plan and water policy formulated under other laws of this state.

The board shall by regulation, establish procedures for notice and hearing on those project proposals which must be submitted to the board and may authorize hearings by hearing officers. The board or its hearing officer shall have power to administer oaths and to require the attendance of such witnesses and the production of such books, records and papers as it may desire at any hearing and for that purpose the board may issue a subpoena for any witnesses or a subpoena duces tecum to compel the production of any books, records or papers which shall be served and returned in the same manner as a subpoena in a civil case. In case of any disobedience or neglect to obey a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum it shall be the duty of the district court in any county of this state in which such disobedience, neglect or refusal occurs, or any judge thereof, on application by the board, to compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of a subpoena issued by a regularly constituted court. The sponsor of a project who appears before the board shall have similar powers and shall have the right to be represented by counsel. If the sponsor does not appear at the appointed time, and his absence is without sufficient cause, the board shall have the right to proceed in his absence or may consider absence to constitute an admission of facts contrary to the position of the sponsor. The board shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law leading to its approval or disapproval.
(d) Any sponsor of a project which has been disapproved shall have the right to have the proceedings of the board reviewed by the district court in the county of his residence. With the exception that judicial review may be had by the district court of the county of the residence of the sponsor, such judicial review shall be accomplished in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 42-1738. Vested water rights protected — Policy of project operation after pay-out defined.

The board shall have no power or authority to do, and shall be and is prohibited from doing, any thing or act which would modify, set aside or alter any existing right or rights to the use of water or the priority of such use as established under existing laws except where the board acquires the consent of the owner or exercises the right of eminent domain as herein provided. It is the policy of the legislature to favor those projects with contractual agreements which provide that, upon completion of revenue bond pay-out, the project will revert to the ownership and management of that group or entity, public or private, which has paid for the project.

§ 42-1739. Bond authorization.

The Idaho water resource board is authorized, for the purpose of carrying out the lawful powers granted it by the laws of this state, to contract indebtedness and issue revenue bonds evidencing such indebtedness in conformity with this chapter.

§ 42-1740. Purposes.

All revenue bonds authorized under the terms of this act may be issued and sold from time to time and in such amounts as are deemed necessary to provide sufficient funds for carrying out all its powers and, without limiting the generality thereof, shall include the following: acquisition of water rights, rehabilitation and repair of existing irrigation projects and irrigation facilities, and construction, maintenance, repair and operation of water projects, engineering and other costs for investigation and promotion of water projects, fiscal and legal expenses, cost of issuance of bonds including printing and advertising expenses, the establishment of bond reserves, and payment of interest on bonds.

§ 42-1741. Form.

Revenue bonds shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at a rate or rates, be payable at such place or places, be in such form either coupon or registered or both, carry such registration privileges and be subject to such terms of redemption as the Idaho water resource board shall by resolution determine.

§ 42-1742. Special funds.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this act shall be payable solely out of revenues of the Idaho water resource board. Such bonds shall be authorized by resolution, which resolution shall create a special fund or funds into which the Idaho water resource board shall obligate and bind the board to set aside and pay any part or parts of, or all of, or a fixed proportion of, or a fixed amount of the available revenue of the board sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on such bonds as the same shall become due and, if deemed necessary, to maintain adequate reserves therefor. No appropriated moneys shall be paid into such special fund or funds provided that any loan repayments to the Idaho water resource board, regardless of the source of funds for the loan, may be deposited to such fund or funds. Such fund or funds shall be drawn upon for the sole purpose of paying the principal of and interest on bonds issued pursuant to this act.

The bonds shall be negotiable instruments within the provisions and intent of the negotiable instrument laws of this state even though they shall be payable solely from such special fund or funds. The bonds and any coupons attached thereto shall state upon their face that they are payable solely from such special fund or funds. If the board fails to set aside and pay into such fund or funds the payments provided for in such resolution, the holder of any such bonds may bring suit to compel compliance with the provisions of the resolution.

§ 42-1743. Covenants.

The board may provide such covenants as it may deem necessary to secure and guarantee the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds, including but not limited to covenants to create reserve accounts and to authorize the deposit of certain moneys therein for the purpose of securing and guaranteeing the payment of such principal and interest, to appoint a state or national bank or trust company as trustee for the bondholders to hold, invest and disburse moneys set aside and pledged to pay and guarantee the payment of such bonds and/or as a trustee for safeguarding the disbursing of the proceeds of the sale of such bonds, to fix such powers and duties of such trustee or trustees as may be found necessary to carry out the purpose of this act, and to make any and all other covenants not inconsistent with the provisions of this act which in the judgment of the board will increase the marketability of such bonds. The board may also provide that revenue bonds payable out of the same source or sources may be later issued on a parity with any revenue bonds being issued and sold. The provisions of this act and any resolution or resolutions providing for the authorization, issuance and sale of such bonds shall constitute a contract with the holders of such bonds and the provisions thereof shall be enforceable by any owner or holder of such bonds by any appropriate suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction.

§ 42-1744. Issuance.

Such bonds shall be signed on behalf of the board by the chairman of the board and shall be attested by the secretary of the board, one of which signatures may be a facsimile signature, and shall have the seal or facsimile seal of the board impressed or imprinted thereon. All interest coupons attached thereto may be signed with the facsimile signatures of such officials. Such bonds shall be sold in the manner and at such price as the board shall deem advisable, either at public or private sale.

§ 42-1745. Warrants.

The board may also issue revenue warrants for the same purposes for which they may issue revenue bonds and the provisions of this act relating to the terms, conditions, covenants, issuance and sale of revenue bonds shall be applicable to such revenue warrants.

§ 42-1746. Funding, refunding bonds.

The board may by resolution, from time to time, provide for the issuance of funding or refunding revenue bonds to fund or refund any outstanding revenue or other warrants or bonds, and any premiums thereon, and coupons evidencing interest upon any such bonds at or before the maturity or first optional redemption date of such coupons, warrants or bonds, and may combine various outstanding revenue warrants and parts or all of various series and issues of outstanding revenue bonds and matured coupons in the amount thereof to be funded or refunded. Revenue bonds may be refunded only at maturity, upon call for redemption in accordance with their terms or with consent of the holder.

The board shall create a special fund or funds for the sole purpose of paying the principal of and interest on such funding or refunding revenue bonds, into which fund the board shall obligate and bind the board to set aside and pay any part or parts of, or all of, or a fixed proportion of, or a fixed amount of the available revenue of the board sufficient to pay such principal and interest as the same shall become due, and if deemed necessary to maintain adequate reserves therefor.

Such funding or refunding bonds shall be negotiable instruments within the provisions and intent of the negotiable instrument laws of this state.

The board may exchange such funding or refunding bonds for the warrants, bonds, and coupons being funded or refunded, or it may sell such funding or refunding bonds in the manner and at such price as the board shall deem to be in the best interest of the state, either at public or private sale, or may both exchange and sell.

The provisions of this act relating to the terms, conditions, covenants, issuance, and sale of revenue bonds shall be applicable to such funding or refunding bonds except as may be otherwise specifically provided in this section.

§ 42-1747. Tax exemption.

Bonds issued pursuant to the authority contained in this act shall be exempt from taxation under the Idaho Income Tax law.

§ 42-1748. Construction of act.

This act shall be authority for the issuance of the bonds and warrants hereby authorized, and shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purposes. Any restrictions, limitations or regulations relative to the issuance of such bonds or warrants contained in any other act shall not apply to the bonds or warrants issued under this act. Any act inconsistent herewith shall be deemed modified to conform with the provisions of this act for the purpose of this act only.

§ 42-1749. Compelling issuance.

In the event that any official required to participate in any act leading to the issuance of such bonds shall refuse to perform such act alleging as his reason illegality of the bonds to be issued, the board may institute judicial proceedings to compel such step to be taken and legality of the bonds to be determined.

§ 42-1750. Revolving fund — Public policy and purpose.

It is in the public interest and it is the public policy of this state, in which there are vast areas of arid land, to develop and to financially assist in and support the development of the water resources of this state through the construction of water projects, including the rehabilitation, improvement, or extension of existing systems or facilities relating thereto, and to achieve that end, to create an Idaho water resource board revolving development fund to be used for that purpose.

§ 42-1751. Definitions.

As used in this act, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Board” means Idaho water resource board.

“Irrigation district,” “canal or irrigation company,” “water users’ association,” “municipal corporation,” or “municipality,” mean such entities created and existing under the laws of the state of Idaho.

“Construction” means the construction, in whole or in part, of a new project, or the improvement or renovation, in whole or in part, of an existing project, or both such construction and improvement or renovation.

“Project” means any project by means of which water shall be utilized or benefits accrue within this state for purposes within the limitations of this act.

“Revolving fund” means Idaho water resource board revolving development fund.

§ 42-1752. Establishment of Idaho water resource board revolving development fund.

There is hereby established in the state treasury a special fund to be known as the Idaho water resource board revolving development fund. All money in the fund is appropriated continuously to the board to be used and administered by it for the purpose of developing the state’s water resources, and shall not be subject to the provisions of the Standard Appropriations Act of 1945 or section 67-3516, Idaho Code.

§ 42-1753. Source of fund.

Funds borrowed from the revolving development fund, together with interest due thereon, shall be repaid to the board and placed in the revolving fund together with receipts and revenues of any type and nature derived from any project constructed, operated, or maintained, in whole or in part, with moneys from the revolving fund, revenues received over and above the cost of projects financed by revenue bonds, revenues collected by or on behalf of water user entities for the purpose of repaying indebtedness under applicable statutory authority, revenues received from the sale of state land acquired by the board for water projects, surplus revenues from the sale of Carey Act (Title 43 USCA s. 641) lands, revenues received from the lease of water rights, fees received from water deliveries which are in excess of costs on projects sponsored by the board, gifts or grants from any source when the same are made for purposes consistent with those for which the revolving fund is established, and moneys from any other appropriate source.

§ 42-1754. Allocation of fund.

The Idaho water resource board revolving development fund shall be allocated for use:

To the board for a project which it deems to be “in the public interest” and which, in its opinion, further implements any extant Idaho state water plan, in such amounts as are necessary for preparation of a feasibility study of the project, engineering services in preparing designs and specifications, and for construction of the project.

As loans from the revolving development fund which may be approved by the board and made to irrigation districts, canal or irrigation companies, water users’ associations, municipal or private corporations, or, in special cases when approved by the board, to individuals to finance project costs, provided, however, that no loans shall be made to finance feasibility studies except as a part of overall project costs.

To establish reserve accounts or guarantee funds in the state treasury to aid in the funding of water projects. Interest earned on such moneys invested by the state treasurer shall be paid into the water resource board revolving development fund.

To the board to finance joint ventures for project construction with federal agencies, neighboring states, legal subdivisions of the state, private corporations, or other organizations, and including the costs of feasibility studies, investigations, and other preparatory expenses, for purposes consistent with those for which the fund is established, and the board is authorized to use the fund for these purposes.

To the board to finance feasibility studies, investigations, and other preparatory expenses for projects it intends to fund through the sale of revenue bonds or through use of funds from other sources.

To the board for payment of costs associated with the issuance and repayment of the board’s revenue bonds.

Section 8 of S.L. 2005, ch. 362 declared an emergency. Approved April 12, 2005.
CASE NOTES

§ 42-1755. Projects — Plans and cost estimates — Repayment contracts — Title.

When a project has been selected by the board to be constructed by the board with money made available from the revolving fund, the board shall cause plans and cost estimates of such project to be prepared and the board is authorized to enter into a contract or contracts for construction of such project after legislative approval. The board shall insure that water developed or conserved by any such project shall be utilized or benefits accrue within this state, and it shall enter into appropriate repayment contracts with the project water users. The board shall assess against any project water user such charge as, in the opinion of the board, is necessary and reasonable for the maintenance and operation of the project during the repayment period and for repayment to the revolving fund of the amount allocated therefrom for making the feasibility study and for construction of the project, including costs for engineering services, design, specifications, and other preparatory expenses. All money allocated to the project from the revolving fund shall be repaid as determined by the board, provided that the repayment period shall not exceed 60 years.

Title to all projects constructed by the board with money from the revolving fund shall vest in the board. At the end of the repayment period, the board shall make a determination, guided by the principles set forth in the act under which it operates, as to whether or not it is in the public interest to turn title to such project over to the users of such project. Its action shall be based upon such determination, and the board is specifically authorized to convey title to the project to those who use the water from such project if it finds this to be in the public interest.